Alabama, session 2026rs, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This section shall be known and may be
cited as the Alabama Professional Workforce Protection Act.
(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the
following:
(1) This state relies on a broad array of highly
skilled and licensed occupations that require advanced
education, internships, clinical rotations, supervised
practice, or board certification.
(2) Recent federal actions have narrowed the definition
of professional degree programs, excluding several occupations
long recognized as professional fields.
(3) These occupations, including nursing, education,
mental health, allied health, public health, engineering,
architecture, accounting, and others, are critical to
Alabama's health care, educational success, public safety, and
economic competitiveness.
(4) Alabama faces workforce shortages in many of these
areas and has a compelling state interest in recognizing and
supporting these professions.
(5) This state should affirm the status of these
occupations as professional careers to protect workforce
pipelines and ensure access to state-level incentives,
scholarships, and workforce development programs.
(c) For the purposes of state law, state workforce
development programs, state-supported scholarships, career
incentive programs, and any state initiative referring to
Page 2

incentive programs, and any state initiative referring to
HB294 INTRODUCED
professional occupations, the following shall be recognized as
professional careers in this state:
(1) Nursing including, but not limited to, registered
nurses, licensed practical nurses, advanced practice nurses,
nurse practitioners, nurse anesthetists, and nurse midwives.
(2) Assistants to physicians.
(3) Physical therapists and occupational therapists.
(4) Speech-language pathologists and audiologists.
(5) Social workers including, but not limited to,
licensed bachelor social workers, licensed master social
workers, and licensed independent clinical social workers.
(6) Mental health counselors including, but not limited
to, licensed professional counselors, licensed marriage and
family therapists, clinical counselors, and school counselors.
(7) Teachers, educators, and administrative staff,
including preK–12 educators and principals and higher
education faculty and administrators.
(8) Public health professionals, including MPH and
DrPH.
(9) Architecture and design professionals including,
but not limited to, licensed architects.
(10) Accounting professionals including, but not
limited to, certified public accountants.
(11) Engineering professionals in all major fields.
(12) Individuals who work in allied health professions
including, but not limited to, respiratory therapy, radiology
sciences, laboratory sciences, dental hygiene, and others who
require licensing, certification, or accredited professional
Page 3

require licensing, certification, or accredited professional
HB294 INTRODUCED
training.
(13) Any additional occupation determined by the
Alabama Department of Workforce, in consultation with the
Alabama Commission on Higher Education, to meet the criteria
of advanced education, licensing, and critical workforce need.
(d) All professional careers listed in subsection (c)
are eligible for:
(1) State workforce development grants and initiatives
referencing professional fields.
(2) State-funded scholarship and loan repayment
programs available to professional careers.
(3) Strategic workforce planning reports and statewide
economic development plans that classify occupations by
professional category.
(e) Nothing in this section shall modify, reduce, or
100 alter the authority or requirements of any state professional
101 or occupational licensing board, agency, or commission.
102 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
103 1, 2026.
Page 4